Utah statutes.
4-4-4.   Unlawful acts specified.
(1)  It is unlawful for any person to sell, offer, or expose any egg for sale
for human consumption:
(a)  that  is addled or mouldy or that contains black spot, black rot, white
rot, blood ring, adherent yolk, or a bloody or green white, also called
albumen; or
(b)  without a sign or label that conforms to the standards for display and
grade adopted by the department.
(2)  Nothing in this section shall prohibit the sale of denatured eggs.
